Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 18

Public Records

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

25-18-101. Reproduction of records generally.

The film or reproducing material shall be of durable material, and the device used to reproduce records on the film or material shall be such as to accurately reproduce and perpetuate the original records in all details.

A facsimile, exemplification, or certified copy of a record for all purposes recited in this subsection shall be deemed to be a transcript, exemplification, or certified copy of the original.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 218, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 16-501 — 16-504.

25-18-102. Microfilming of records by Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 281, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-414.

25-18-103. Fee for facsimile copies.

The fees charged by the Secretary of State for facsimile copies of any state record document shall be the same as is provided by law for certified copies.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 281, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-415.

Subchapter 2

— State Publications

Preambles. Acts 1893, No. 85 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, The index to the Acts of the General Assembly is a matter of great convenience and importance to the general public; and

“Whereas, The index to these books is generally so imperfect and inaccurate as to make it very difficult to readily refer to the matters contained therein; therefore….”

Acts 1937, No. 97 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the Law Library Association, Inc., of Shelby County, Tennessee, an eleemosynary institution of the City of Memphis, County of Shelby, State of Tennessee, organized and supported by the members of the Bar of the City of Memphis, County of Shelby, State of Tennessee, maintains for use of its members a fully equipped law library in the City of Memphis, County of Shelby, State of Tennessee; and

“Whereas, the County of Shelby, State of Tennessee, furnishes without charge quarters for said library in the Shelby County Courthouse; and

“Whereas, the sole and only source of revenue of said association consists of donations from interested persons and dues from its resident members; and

“Whereas, the facilities of said association are open to non-resident lawyers without charge therefor, and said association, through its officers and its members, has consistently urged members of the Bar of Arkansas to make use of its facilities without the slightest charge therefor; and

“Whereas, such privilege is of inestimable benefit to the lawyers practicing in this state because of the fact that the lawyer of a small town cannot maintain or equip a library with the facilities afforded by said association except at an exorbitant cost: Now, Therefore….”

Acts 1951, No. 84 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, there are now only a small number of the justices of the peace in this state conducting justice courts and engaging in the active hearing of cases; and

“Whereas, in a great majority of instances, the duties of hearing and trying cases before justices of the peace have been transferred to municipal courts, and in such cases, the justices of the peace are not actively engaged in hearing either civil or criminal cases;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1868, No. 33, § 6: effective on passage.

Acts 1874, No. 6, p. 42, § 27: effective on passage.

Acts 1877, No. 74, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1891, No. 124, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1891, No. 154, § 8: effective on passage.

Acts 1921, No. 207, § 7: Emergency declared.

Acts 1939, No. 162, § 4: Emergency declared.

Acts 1955, No. 429, § 6: Mar. 30, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the General Assembly that the volumes of the Arkansas Reports included in this act are out of print and cannot now be obtained in bound form, resulting in confusion and uncertainty and great inconvenience to a large portion of population and this act being necessary for the immediate correction of this dire situation and for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect upon its approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 835, § 5: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential for the administration of justice and for the administration and enforcement of the fiscal laws of this State that early printing and distribution of the Acts of the General Assembly shall be expeditious as possible, in order that the courts, public officials and citizens of this State may be advised of the laws that have been enacted and of the changes made in existing laws; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order to provide for the funds whereby the Secretary of State may requisition the printing of the Acts as provided by law without undue delay. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 328, § 3: Mar. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is immediately necessary to increase the charge collected for printed copies of the Arkansas Supreme Court Reports, in order to enable the State of Arkansas to recover the cost of printing said Reports, and that clarification is immediately needed with respect to the procedures to be followed in the sale and distribution of certain copies of said Reports, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 831, § 4: Apr. 4, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential for the administration of justice and for the administration and enforcement of the fiscal laws of this State; that early printing and distribution of the Acts of the General Assembly shall be expeditious as possible, in order that the courts, public officials and citizens of this State may be advised immediately of the laws that have been enacted and of the changes made in existing laws; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order to provide for the funds whereby the Secretary of State may requisition the printing or reproduce the Acts as provided by law without undue delay. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 664, § 5: Mar. 30, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that there is an immediate need to provide qualified interpreters for deaf persons at administrative, civil and criminal proceedings and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 644, § 3: Apr. 4, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is immediately necessary that the price to be charged by the Secretary of State for volumes of the Arkansas Supreme Court Reports must be increased to enable the State to recover the costs of printing and binding of the volumes and the postage cost for mailing; that this Act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1063, § 4: Apr. 17, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that sufficient funding was not provided to the Secretary of State to print, mail and distribute the complimentary copies of the Bound Book Report which is an historical report issued every ten years; that the current financial situation will not permit the number of complimentary copies to remain the same nor to provide additional funds to complete the contract; and that this Act will allow the Secretary of State the flexibility in his current operating appropriation to fulfill the State's commitment and to lower the number of required copies to be printed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 709, § 21: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 879, § 10: Apr. 3, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law concerning the publication and distribution of the acts of Arkansas is in need of modification; that this act provides the necessary modifications; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to provide for the publication and distribution of the acts of this regular session as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 976, § 25: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 751, § 9: Mar. 22, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there are presently inadequate statutory guidelines for the codifications of the acts of the General Assembly; this act establishes necessary guidelines; and this act should go into effect immediately in order that the guidelines will be in effect for the codification of the acts of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-18-201. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the distribution of messages and reports, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 956, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1874, No. 6, § 17, p. 42; 1877, No. 74, § 2, p. 77; 1891, No. 154, § 3, p. 262; C. & M. Dig., §§ 9229-9231; Pope's Dig., §§ 11915-11917; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-401.

25-18-202. Messages, reports, and other documents — Number of copies.

If any report, bill, or other document is ordered to be printed by the General Assembly and no number of copies is designated, there shall be printed at the public expense not more than two hundred forty (240) copies.

History.

Acts 1874, No. 6, § 22, p. 42; C. & M. Dig., § 9239; Pope's Dig., § 11925; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-402.

25-18-203. Messages, reports, and other documents — Covers and title pages.

In printing messages, reports, and other documents ordered to be printed by the General Assembly or by any officer, in pursuance of law or resolution of either house of the General Assembly, the contractor may attach covers and prefix a title page to each message or report of a state officer or superintendent of a state institution, but the contractor shall dispense with full title pages in reports of committees and other short documents and affix only a half-title at the top of the first page of every document.

History.

Acts 1874, No. 6, § 15, p. 42; C. & M. Dig., § 9227; Pope's Dig., § 11913; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-403.

25-18-204. Journals of legislative proceedings.

Whenever any journal of the proceedings of the House of Representatives and Senate for any regular or extraordinary session of those bodies, or either of them, is authorized to be published by any enactment of the General Assembly, publication shall be made and the published journal shall be released for distribution within six (6) months of the date of adjournment of those bodies at any session of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 141, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-439.

25-18-205. Acts of General Assembly — Index — Printing — Certification.

The Secretary of State shall make out true and accurate copies of all the laws, resolutions, and memorials and deliver them to the contractor for printing the acts of the General Assembly as fast as the contractor may need the copies in fulfillment of his or her contract as required by law.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to have prepared and furnish to the public printer a full, thorough, and complete index with subheads to the acts of the General Assembly.

The Secretary of State shall pay for the copying of the acts by the public printer at the rate of ten cents (10¢) per one hundred (100) words, and for indexing and subheading the acts, a reasonable compensation to be fixed by the State Board of Public Printing not to exceed the customary price paid for such work.

The Acts of Arkansas shall be printed in two (2) volumes.

Volume I shall contain only appropriation acts and the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq., and amendments relative thereto and may be printed in two (2) books if the Secretary of State considers it mechanically expedient.

Volume II shall contain all other acts of the General Assembly and may be printed in two (2) books if the Secretary of State considers it mechanically expedient.

Acts establishing the amount of salary, compensation, or allowances, and the method of payment thereof, for county officers, their deputies and other employees in their offices, deputy prosecuting attorneys, court reporters, court stenographers, and other employees of circuit courts shall be printed in Volume II.

Volume II, or Book 2 of Volume II if there is one, shall also contain the acts of the extraordinary sessions of the General Assembly.

The date of approval by the Governor shall be stated at the end of each act, resolution, and memorial, omitting the name and style of the Governor and presiding officers of the two (2) houses.

At the end of each volume of the acts, there shall be a full and complete index.

The Secretary of State is authorized, if he or she determines it to be in the public interest, to publish and distribute separate acts, or a group of acts dealing with the same or related subjects, in pamphlet form.

The contractor shall furnish to the Secretary of State at his or her office a proof of each form of the laws, in the course of their publication, and a reader to assist in comparing the proof with the original rolls.

It is made the duty of the Secretary of State to insert his or her certificate in the pamphlet containing the printed laws, joint resolutions, memorials, and similar items that the laws thus printed are “correct copies of the original on file in his or her office”.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section may be superseded in whole or in part by §25-18-225.

Cross References. Initiative and referendum measures approved by people to be printed with general laws, §7-9-120.

Where the Governor signed a bill with the intent of approving it in the manner provided by the Constitution to make it effective, it became the law and his approval could not be revoked by him or his successor, even though the bill remained in the Governor's office and the time fixed by the Constitution for acting upon the bill had not expired. Powell v. Hayes, 83 Ark. 448, 104 S.W. 177 (1907).

Mandamus is the proper remedy whereby one specially interested in the enforcement of a statute may compel the Secretary of State to publish an act of the General Assembly under his certificate. Hodges v. Keel, 108 Ark. 184, 159 S.W. 21 (1913).

Cited: Hodges v. Lawyers' Co-op. Publ'g Co., 111 Ark. 571, 164 S.W. 294 (1914).

Cross References. Two copies of state publications to be placed at disposal of history commission, §13-3-108.

Cited: Armco Steel Corp. v. Ford Constr. Co., 237 Ark. 272, 372 S.W.2d 630 (1963).

Cross References. Records, books, and papers to be delivered to successor in office, §21-12-401 et seq.

History.

Acts 1852, § 1, p. 43; 1874, No. 6, § 16, p. 42; 1891, No. 154, § 2, p. 262; 1893, No. 85, §§ 1, 2, p. 152; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4394, 4395, 4402, 9228; Pope's Dig., §§ 5409, 5410, 5417, 11914; Acts 1973, No. 835, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-404, 14-406 — 14-408.

25-18-206. Digests, acts, and journals — Distribution.

It shall be the Secretary of State's duty to distribute the acts and journals and all laws as are by law required to be distributed among the different counties of this state.

The Secretary of State shall issue his or her requisition for the acts in whatever quantities are necessary to make the distribution required by law.

(1)The Secretary of State shall reserve from sale copies of the acts of the General Assembly for free distribution of one (1) copy of each, as they are published and bound, to the following officers, only upon written request therefor within thirty (30) days following the date of adjournment sine die of any legislative session:

County judges;

County clerks;

Prosecuting attorneys;

District judges;

Circuit judges;

The Supreme Court Reporter;

Supreme Court Justices;

Court of Appeals Judges;

The Supreme Court Librarian;

The Attorney General;

Each state department;

Circuit clerks;

Sheriffs;

Tax collectors;

County treasurers;

Assessors; and

Members of the General Assembly.

However, the Attorney General upon written request within the same time period shall be supplied with two (2) copies of each.

Members of the General Assembly shall be entitled to one (1) copy of the journal of the preceding session and of the session of which they are members.

History.

Acts 1849, § 2, p. 75; C. & M. Dig., § 4403; Acts 1921, No. 207, § 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 5418, 5434; Acts 1939, No. 162, § 1; 1951, No. 84, § 1; 1965, No. 405, § 1; 1973, No. 835, § 3; 1975, No. 831, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-415, 14-416, 14-416.1, 14-419; Acts 1995, No. 709, §§ 15, 16; 1995, No. 933, § 1; 1997, No. 976, §§ 16, 17; 2003, No. 1165, § 14[12]; 2003, No. 1185, § 266.

25-18-207. Digests, acts, and journals — Delivery to successors — Annual settlement.

(1)The officers, except the Clerk of the Supreme Court and the members of the General Assembly, receiving digests, acts, and journals shall keep them in good order and turn over the volumes to their successors in office.

On failure to do so without properly accounting for the books, they shall be fined in any sum not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

(1)All officers, except members of the General Assembly, receiving or having custody of books under §§25-18-206 —25-18-209 and25-18-220 [repealed] shall be liable under their bonds for the full value of the books.

All officers settling with any courts or other authority shall account for the books at each annual settlement in like manner as for all money and other assets of their office. Those officers shall make good to the State Treasury the value in money of all books not legally accounted for and shall exhibit the State Treasury receipt for the money in the settlement.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 207, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 5437; Acts 1939, No. 162, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-417, 14-420.

25-18-208. Digests, acts, and journals — Lost or destroyed books.

If any of the digests, acts, and journals shall be lost or destroyed, the officer whose books have become lost or destroyed may obtain a duplicate copy from the Secretary of State by furnishing the Secretary of State a statement under oath of the facts in the case, setting out the reason why the books are missing and that the loss is due to no fault or negligence of the officer and whether or not settlement for the books has been made under §25-18-207.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 207, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 5438; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-418.

25-18-209. Sale of digests and acts — Price.

The Secretary of State shall have the authority and power and is required to sell Crawford and Moses' Digest of the Statutes of Arkansas at five dollars ($5.00) per copy and to sell the acts of the General Assembly at the actual pro rata cost to the state for publishing them in order to recover the per volume cost to the state.

This section shall not apply to acts of the General Assembly prior to 1917, which acts shall be sold at one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per set, except those acts which are bound in paper, which shall sell at one dollar ($1.00) per set.

The Secretary of State shall have the authority to make reduction in price of the books when they become damaged, the reduction per set not to be less than one-half (½) the original selling price.

The price of Mansfield's Digest is fixed at one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per copy.

The Secretary of State shall retain five hundred (500) copies for use of the state.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning distribution of Supreme Court and Court of Appeals reports, additional set of Supreme Court and Court of Appeals reports for Supreme Court Justices and Court of Appeals Judges, duties of clerks, and annual check of county libraries and clerks' offices, were repealed by Acts 2009, No. 221, §§ 9-12. These sections were derived from the following sources:

25-18-210. Acts 1941, No. 413, §§ 1, 2; 1971, No. 322, § 1; 1975, No. 328, § 2; 1979, No. 223, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-422, 14-423; Acts 1989, No. 488, § 1; 1989, No. 499, § 1; 1991, No. 549, § 1.

25-18-211. Acts 1917, No. 129, § 1, p. 683; 1989, No. 488, § 2; 1991, No. 549, § 2.

25-18-212. Acts 1941, No. 413, § 1; 1971, No. 322, § 1; 1975, No. 328, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-422; Acts 1991, No. 549, § 3.

25-18-213. Acts 1941, No. 413, § 1; 1971, No. 322, § 1; 1975, No. 328, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-422; Acts 1989, No. 488, § 3; 1991, No. 549, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes. In 2009, the Supreme Court directed that publication of the Arkansas Reports and Arkansas Appellate Reports would be discontinued and that the electronic versions of appellate decisions posted on the Arkansas Judiciary website would be the official report of those decisions. All appellate decisions handed down after February 14, 2009, are officially reported and distributed in electronic form via the Arkansas Judiciary website. §16-11-202.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section heading; redesignated the section; inserted “bound volumes of” in (a); rewrote (b); and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “The volume shall not be loaned or removed” for “No volume shall be loaned or removed” in (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b).

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning replacement of destroyed volumes of Supreme Court and Court of Appeals reports, number of copies of Supreme Court and Court of Appeals reports reserved by the Administrative Office of the Courts, and expense of distribution was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 221, § 14-16. These sections were derived from the following sources:

25-18-215. Acts 1941, No. 413, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-424; Acts 1989, No. 488, § 4; 1991, No. 549, § 6.

25-18-216. Acts 1868, No. 33, § 3, p. 110; 1873, No. 91, § 3, p. 225; C. & M. Dig., § 4417; Pope's Dig., § 5432; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-425; Acts 1989, No. 488, § 5; 1991, No. 549, § 7.

25-18-217. Acts 1853, § 3, p. 202; C. & M. Dig., § 4409; Pope's Dig., § 5424; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-426; Acts 1989, No. 488, § 6.

A system of subscription-based access to additional features; and

Reasonable charges for the provision of reports on disc or other physical medium.

A.C.R.C. Notes. See note at §25-18-214.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the distribution of United States statutes, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 956, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1868, No. 33, §§ 4, 5, p. 110; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-437, 14-438.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning exchange of books with federal, state, and foreign entities, and distribution of reports and proceedings of the General Assembly to the Law Library Association, Inc., Shelby County, Tennessee, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 221, § 18 and 19. These sections were derived from the following sources:

25-18-220. Acts 1921, No. 207, § 3; 1937, No. 209, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 5435; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-427; Acts 1989, No. 488, § 8; 1991, No. 549, § 8.

25-18-221. Acts 1937, No. 97, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 5440; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-434; Acts 1989, No. 488, § 9.

History.

Acts 1891, No. 124, § 1, p. 212; 1921, No. 207, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 4418; Pope's Dig., §§ 5433, 5449; Acts 1973, No. 835, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-412, 14-414.

25-18-210 — 25-18-213. [Repealed.]

The clerk and his or her bondsmen shall be personally liable and responsible for the safekeeping of bound volumes of the reports.

The volume shall not be loaned or removed except that the clerk, upon approval of the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, may remove or otherwise dispose of bound volumes if the official reports are available in electronic or other readily accessible medium in each county in the State of Arkansas for the general use of the courts, county officials, and attorneys.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 413, § 1; 1971, No. 322, § 1; 1975, No. 328, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-422; Acts 1991, No. 549, § 5; 2009, No. 221, § 13; 2011, No. 1122, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 3582.

25-18-215 — 25-18-217. [Repealed.]

(1)The reports of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals shall be published and distributed in such format and medium as the Supreme Court may direct.

The medium shall be a permanent, secure, and unalterable record of the final, official decisions of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals.

(1)The reports shall be made publicly available for viewing at no charge via the Internet or other medium that is readily accessible by the public.

However, the Administrative Office of the Courts may establish:

History.

Acts 1925, No. 357, § 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 1616, 13329; Acts 1955, No. 429, § 3; 1975, No. 328, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-421, 14-421.1; Acts 1987, No. 644, § 1; 1989, No. 488, § 7; 1995, No. 549, § 1;
2009, No. 221, § 17.

25-18-219. [Repealed.]

25-18-222. References to deaf people.

The archaic terms “dumb” and “deaf-mute” that formerly related to deaf people shall be struck from all future state publications that in any way refer to the deaf.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 664, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-715.3.

25-18-223. Book report of Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall compile, edit, and publish a bound book report of the Secretary of State for the period ending December 31, 2018.

The book report shall pertain to substantially the same subject matter as the earlier biennial reports of the Secretary of State and other data, both historical and contemporary, that in the opinion of the Secretary of State would be of interest to all citizens of Arkansas.

The book report shall be printed under the proper contract for state printing.

The Secretary of State shall distribute the book reports in the following manner:

One (1) copy to each city, county, regional, public school, parochial school, and institution of higher learning library in the State of Arkansas; and

One (1) copy to elected officials upon written request received by the Secretary of State no later than March 31, 2019.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “2008” for “1997” in (a)(1); substituted “One (1) copy” for “Two (2) copies” in (b)(2), inserted “district judge” in (b)(4), redesignated and rewrote (b)(5), and deleted (b)(6); deleted (c); and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment redesignated (a)(1) as (a)(1)(A) and (B); in (a)(1)(A), substituted “shall compile, edit, and publish” for “is directed to cause to be compiled, edited, and published” and “December 31, 2018” for “December 31, 2008”; substituted “The book report shall pertain to substantially the same” for “and containing the same information and” in (a)(1)(B); in the introductory language of (b), substituted “The” for “Upon receipt of the volumes of the historical bound book report, the” and “the book reports” for “them”; deleted former (b)(1); redesignated former (b)(2) as (b)(1); deleted former (b)(3) through (b)(5); and added present (b)(2).

If such a board, commission, or agency affirms and adopts as its own the opinion or order of a hearing officer, administrative law judge, or referee, a copy of the opinion or order affirmed shall be attached to the order or opinion of the board, commission, or agency.

Such quasijudicial board, commission, or agency may make a charge for providing such opinions and orders, but the charge shall be limited to the actual cost of reproduction and shall be approved by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(2).

Administrative decisions of the Office of Hearings and Appeals and opinions of the Department of Finance and Administration which contain information which is confidential pursuant to the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq., shall be exempt from the disclosure provisions of subsection (a) of this section.

The Secretary of State shall permanently maintain the original and one (1) copy of all:

Resolutions;

Proposed constitutional amendments, both initiated and referred; and

Proposed initiated acts.

The Secretary of State shall:

Make true and accurate reproductions, as technology permits, of the original documents of:

Acts;

Initiated acts;

Resolutions;

Memorials; and

Constitutional amendments, both initiated and referred; and

Deliver them to the contractor for printing as the Acts of Arkansas.

General acts and appropriation acts shall be numbered consecutively as they are approved by the appropriate body.

General acts and appropriation acts shall be printed consecutively.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to have prepared a full, thorough, and complete index.

A general index shall cover:

General acts;

Appropriation acts;

Initiated acts;

Special and local acts;

Memorials; and

Resolutions.

The Secretary of State shall insert his or her certificate in the pamphlet containing the printed laws, resolutions, memorials, and similar items that the laws thus printed are “correct copies of the original on file in the Office of the Secretary of State”.

The Secretary of State is authorized, if that office determines it to be in the public interest, to publish and distribute separate acts, or a group of acts dealing with the same or related subjects, in pamphlet or book form.

The Acts of Arkansas shall be published containing the acts of the General Assembly exactly as enacted by the General Assembly. Acts passed by the General Assembly in markup format shall be published in markup format. No correction, change, renumbering, substitution, redesignation, or rearrangement shall be made to the text of the acts published in the Acts of Arkansas.

Cross References. Depositories and clearinghouses, §§13-2-210 —13-2-214.

State and local publications defined, §13-2-201.

Preambles. Acts 1947, No. 170 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, it is desirable that there should be a comprehensive collection of public documents for teachers, students, and research workers in the state; and

“Whereas, the General Library of the University of Arkansas is a full depository for the documents of the United States government; and

“Whereas, this library is seriously handicapped in acquiring Arkansas state, municipal and county documents, and the documents of other states for lack of suitable documents to offer in return;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1905, No. 80, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1971, No. 163, § 6: Feb. 26, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 170 of 1947, as amended, requires all state agencies, and all cities and counties, to file copies of various documents and publications with the General Library of the University of Arkansas in Fayetteville; and it is further determined by the General Assembly that in order to make documents of the state, cities, and counties more readily accessible to the public at convenient locations throughout the state, and for use by students and the public at state-supported institutions of higher learning, it is essential that all state, city, and county agencies be required to furnish copies of printed publications to the libraries of the various state-supported institutions of higher learning; that only by the immediate passage of this act may prompt implementation of the provisions of this act be carried out. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1224, § 12: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1993, No. 1224, § 6: repeal effective by its own terms on July 1, 1994.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 643, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-406n; Acts 1987, No. 1063, § 2; 1997, No. 365, § 1; 2009, No. 192, § 1; 2017, No. 395, § 1.

25-18-224. Distribution of quasijudicial opinions and orders.

(1)(A)Any quasijudicial board, commission, or agency of the state shall, on request, provide copies of its opinions and orders to any publication or reporting service which routinely reports on its opinions and orders.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 563, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 910, § 3583.

25-18-225. Publishing and distribution of Arkansas acts.

Acts of the General Assembly;

Memorials;

The Secretary of State shall arrange for the printing and distribution of these documents as provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 879, §§ 1-6; 1999, No. 751, § 5.

Subchapter 3

— Depositories

25-18-301. Designation of official state depository.

The Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville shall be designated as an official state depository of all public documents published by or under the authority of the state or any division thereof.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 170, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-428.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1947, No. 170, § 5, provided that the act was cumulative to and did not repeal §§13-3-101 —13-3-108.

25-18-302 — 25-18-304. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning publications, were repealed by Acts 1993, No. 1224, § 6. These sections were derived from the following sources:

25-18-302. Acts 1947, No. 170, § 2; 1955, No. 379, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-429.

25-18-304. Acts 1947, No. 170, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-431.

The Secretary of State is further directed to send to the Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville a copy of all publications of the federal government, where there are duplicate copies in the library of the Secretary of State. This shall include the Congressional Globe, Congressional Record , executive documents, departmental and commercial reports, and any federal documents.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 80, § 3, p. 201; C. & M. Dig., § 4405; Pope's Dig., § 5420; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-433.